New York, session 2025-2026, S9624.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The business corporation law is amended by adding a new 2 section 104-B to read as follows: 3 § 104-B. Veteran exemption from fees. 4 (a) As used in this section, "veteran" shall mean a person who served 5 in the United States army, navy, air force, marines, coast guard and/or 6 reserves thereof, and/or in the army national guard, air national guard, 7 New York guard, and/or New York naval militia and who (1) has received 8 an honorable or general discharge from such service, or (2) has a quali- 9 fying condition, as defined in section one of the veterans' services 10 law, and has received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable 11 from such service, or (3) is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in 12 section one of the veterans' services law, and has received a discharge 13 other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such service; and such 14 person is a resident of the state of New York at the time undertaking an 15 action subject to a fee pursuant to section one hundred four-A of this 16 article. 17 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no veteran shall be 18 required to pay the fees otherwise required by section one hundred 19 four-A of this article within five years of (1) receiving an honorable 20 or general discharge from military service, or (2) receiving confirma- 21 tion from the department of veterans' services of a qualifying condi- 22 tion, or (3) receiving confirmation from the department of veterans' 23 services of their status as a discharged LGBT veteran. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07923-01-5 S. 9624 2 1 (c) Status as an eligible veteran pursuant to this section shall be 2 documented pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commis- 3 sioner of the department of state. 4 § 2. The not-for-profit corporation law is amended by adding a new 5 section 104-B to read as follows: 6 § 104-B. Veteran exemption from fees. 7 (a) As used in this section, "veteran" shall mean a person who served 8 in the United States army, navy, air force, marines, coast guard and/or 9 reserves thereof, and/or in the army national guard, air national guard, 10 New York guard, and/or New York naval militia and who (1) has received 11 an honorable or general discharge from such service, or (2) has a quali- 12 fying condition, as defined in section one of the veterans' services 13 law, and has received a discharge other than bad conduct or dishonorable 14 from such service, or (3) is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in 15 section one of the veterans' services law, and has received a discharge 16 other than bad conduct or dishonorable from such service; and such 17 person is a resident of the state of New York at the time undertaking an 18 action subject to a fee pursuant to section one hundred four-A of this 19 article. 20 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no veteran shall be 21 required to pay the fees otherwise required by section one hundred 22 four-A of this article within five years of (1) receiving an honorable 23 or general discharge from military service, or (2) receiving confirma- 24 tion from the department of veterans' services of a qualifying condi- 25 tion, or (3) receiving confirmation from the department of veterans' 26 services of their status as a discharged LGBT veteran. 27 (c) Status as an eligible veteran pursuant to this section shall be 28 documented pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commis- 29 sioner of the department of state. 30 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 31 it shall have become a law.